apertium-da-nb.da.dix
<pardef n="numeros___mergeTODO">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?(%)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>DKK</l><r><b/>DKK<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>EUR</l><r><b/>EUR<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kr</l><r><b/>kr<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>NOK</l><r><b/>NOK<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>rdl.</l><r><b/>rdl.<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>SEK</l><r><b/>SEK<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>tkr</l><r><b/>tkr<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>USD</l><r><b/>USD<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>ton</l><r><b/>ton<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kg</l><r><b/>kg<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>hg</l><r><b/>hg<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>g</l><r><b/>g<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>mg</l><r><b/>mg<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>km</l><r><b/>km<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>m</l><r><b/>m<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>dm</l><r><b/>dm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>cm</l><r><b/>cm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>mm</l><r><b/>mm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>har</l><r><b/>har<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>ar</l><r><b/>ar<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kvm</l><r><b/>kvm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kvcm</l><r><b/>kvcm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>MB</l><r><b/>MB<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kB</l><r><b/>kB<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>Mb</l><r><b/>Mb<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kb</l><r><b/>kb<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>MHz</l><r><b/>MHz<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kV</l><r><b/>kV<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kW</l><r><b/>kW<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kWh</l><r><b/>kWh<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>MW</l><r><b/>MW<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>hk</l><r><b/>hk<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kcal</l><r><b/>kcal<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>km/h</l><r><b/>km/h<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kp</l><r><b/>kp<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>m/s</l><r><b/>m/s<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>N</l><r><b/>N<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>Nm</l><r><b/>Nm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>krydderimål</l><r><b/>krydderimål<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>spsk.</l><r><b/>spsk./h<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>tsk.</l><r><b/>tsk.<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

<!-- senere
  <e>       <re>[1-9]+([0-9]+)?(%)?</re><p><l>-årige</l><r>-årige<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[MCDXVLI]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
-->
</pardef>

<pardef n="separa___mergeTODO">
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/lille__adj___mergeTODO">
  <e>       <p><l>lille</l>     <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>små</l>       <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lille</l>     <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>små</l>       <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mindre</l>    <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mindst</l>    <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mindste</l>   <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dens__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Is this a determiner?! Yes it is, but it has other forms as well
    <pardef n="selv__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    -->

<pardef n="ens__det"> <!-- PT: possesivt pronomen från pers pron 'man'-->
  <e a="PT" c="mina"><p><l></l> <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Proper nouns -->

<pardef n="S__case___mergeTODO"> <!-- Case endings for nouns not ending on s (mand / mands) -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="apos__case___mergeTODO"> <!-- Case endings for nouns ending on s (hus / hus' ) -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Abbreviations -->

<pardef n="t.eks.__abbr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Pronouns -->

<pardef n="/jeg__prn___mergeTODO">
  <e>       <p><l>jeg</l>       <r>jeg<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mig</l>       <r>jeg<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/u__prn___mergeTODO">
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ha/n__prn___mergeTODO">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>m</l>         <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="h/un__prn___mergeTODO">
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>un<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>un<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>endes</l>     <r>un<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="selv"><i>selv</i><par n="selv__det"/></e>
<e lm="dens" a="PT">     <i>dens</i><par n="dens__det"/></e>
<e lm="ens" a="PT">      <i>ens</i><par n="ens__det"/></e>
<e lm="DKK" a="PT">      <i>DKK</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="NOK" a="PT">      <i>NOK</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="a/s" c="aktieselskab"><i>a/s</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ang." a="PT">     <i>ang.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="arr." a="PT">     <i>arr.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="bh" a="PT">       <i>bh</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ca." a="PT">      <i>ca.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="cd-r" a="PT">     <i>cd-r</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="d.s.s." c="det samme som"><i>d.s.s.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="dec." a="PT">     <i>dec.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="diam." a="PT">    <i>diam.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="dl" a="PT">       <i>dl</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="DR" a="PT" c="Danmarks radio"><i>DR</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="dvs.">            <i>dvs.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="efter" a="PT"><i>efter</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="eksempel" a="PT"><i>eksempel</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="evt." a="PT">     <i>evt.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="feb." a="PT">     <i>feb.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="fmd" c="formand (president)"><i>fmd</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="forts." a="PT">   <i>forts.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="hektar" a="PT">   <i>hektar</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="istf." a="PT">    <i>istf.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="kg" a="PT">       <i>kg</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="kvadratcentimeter" a="PT"><i>kvadratcentimeter</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="m.fl." a="PT">    <i>m.fl.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ml" a="PT">       <i>ml</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="nu" a="PT">       <i>nu</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="osv.">            <i>osv.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="plur." a="PT">    <i>plur.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="sept." a="PT">    <i>sept.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="t.o.m." a="PT">   <i>t.o.m.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="to." a="PT">      <i>to.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="venligst vend" a="PT"><i>venligst<b/>vend</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="d.s." a="PT">     <i>d.s.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="edb" a="PT" c="domain:data"><i>edb</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ekskl." a="PT">   <i>ekskl.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="fig." a="PT">     <i>fig.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="gn." a="PT">      <i>gn.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="hvoribl." a="PT"> <i>hvoribl.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="inkl." a="PT">    <i>inkl.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="k/s" a="PT">      <i>k/s</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="knsp." a="PT" c="domain:recept"><i>knsp.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="l." a="PT">       <i>l.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="m.a.o." a="PT">   <i>m.a.o.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="medd." a="PT">    <i>medd.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="MW" a="PT">       <i>MW</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="nto." a="PT">     <i>nto.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="omk." a="PT">     <i>omk.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ovs." a="PT">     <i>ovs.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="pg." a="PT">      <i>pg.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="PS" a="PT" c="domain:brev"><i>PS</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="Rdl." a="PT" c="style:old"><i>Rdl.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="sg." a="PT" c="domain:språk"><i>sg.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="Stockholms Universitet" a="PT"><i>Stockholms Universitet</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="sydl." a="PT">    <i>sydl.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="tekn." a="PT">    <i>tekn.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="tv" a="PT">       <i>tv</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ved hj. af" a="PT"><i>ved<b/>hj.<b/>af</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="zoo" a="PT">      <i>zoo</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="kWh" a="PT" c="domain:enheter"><i>kWh</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="dl." a="PT" c="domain:recept"><i>dl.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
